New Jersey, session 222, S792.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 28 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-28) is amended to read as follows: 28.  a.  Applicants possessing a license to render services in another state or a foreign country, which services are included within the definition of cosmetology and hairstyling as set forth in P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.), may be issued a license as a cosmetologist-hairstylist, beautician, barber, manicurist, hair braiding or skin care specialist, as appropriate, without examination, provided, however, that the state or country has established eligibility criteria substantially similar to those established in this State, and the applicant has paid a fee as required by the board and submitted certification from the licensing jurisdiction.  A person possessing a license to practice cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty services issued by a licensing authority from another state or a foreign country which has established eligibility criteria with respect to cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty training which are, in the opinion of the board, less stringent than those required in this State may, nevertheless, be eligible for licensure without examination, if he can present satisfactory evidence of prior practical experience of three years working in a licensed shop in the practice in which the applicant is seeking licensure or prior teaching experience in a facility licensed or otherwise approved by an agency in the other jurisdiction to allow teaching in cosmetology and hairstyling services. b.    There is established a three-year pilot program, administered by the board in consultation with the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in any city of the second class having a population of not less than 69,000 persons or more than 80,000 persons that is located in a county of the second class having a population of not less than 500,000 persons or more than 510,000 persons, according to the 2010 federal decennial census, to permit a person possessing a license to render barbering services in another state or foreign country, which services are included within the definition of barbering as set forth in section 3 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-3), to practice as a barber upon first arrival in this State and while awaiting the issuance of a license as a barber pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  A person that renders barbering services without a license, under the pilot program established pursuant to this subsection, shall not be in violation of section 14 of P.L.1995, c.82 (C.45:5B-12.1) or any other provision of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.) that prohibits the practice of barbering without a license, provided that  the person has made a good faith effort to obtain a license in this State pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of this section and the person is under the direct supervision of a barber licensed in this State pursuant to P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.). c.     The board, in consultation with the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall submit a report evaluating the effectiveness of the pilot program established pursuant to subsection b. of this section to the Governor and, pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature upon completion of the pilot program. (cf: P.L.2019, c.20, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.